Utah statutes.
77-20-9.   Disposition of forfeitures.
If by reason of the neglect of the defendant to appear, money deposited
instead of bail or money paid by sureties on surety bond is forfeited and the
forfeiture is not discharged or remitted, the clerk with whom it is deposited
or paid shall, immediately after final adjournment of the court, pay over the
money forfeited as follows:
(1)  the forfeited bail cases in or appealed from district courts shall be
distributed as provided in Section 78A-5-110;
(2)  the forfeited bail in cases in precinct justice courts or in municipal
justice courts shall be distributed as provided in Sections 78A-7-120 and
78A-7-121;
(3)  the forfeited bail in cases in justice courts where the offense is not
triable in that court shall be paid into the General Fund; and
(4)  the forfeited bail in cases not provided for in this section shall be
paid 50% to the state treasurer and the remaining 50% to the county treasurer
in the county in which the violation occurred or the forfeited bail is
collected.
